Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1944
Applicant or licensee; notification
to department; failure to notify department; effect.

(1) Within fifteen days after the mailing
of a notice under section 71-1943, an applicant or licensee shall notify the
department in writing that the applicant or licensee:

(a) Desires to
contest the notice and requests a hearing; or

(b) Does not contest the
notice.

(2) If the department does not receive notification within the
fifteen-day period, the action of the department shall be final.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 21.